Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-3031
Orders; rules and regulations.

The director may issue any order and adopt and promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to implement the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 31.